North Carolina statutes. Chapter 163. Elections and Election Laws.
Article 15A. Counting Ballots, Canvassing Votes, Hearing Protests, and Certifying Results.

§ 163-182.
Definitions.

In addition to the definitions stated below, the definitions set forth in Article 14A of this Chapter also apply to this Article. As used in this Article, the following definitions apply:

“Abstract” means a document signed by the members of the board of elections showing the votes for each candidate and ballot proposal on the official ballot in the election. The abstract shall show a total number of votes for each candidate in each precinct
and a total for each candidate in the county. It shall also show the number of votes for each candidate among the absentee official ballots, among the provisional official ballots, and in any other category of official ballots
that is not otherwise reported.

“Certificate of election” means a document prepared by the official or body with the legal authority to do so, conferring upon a candidate the right to assume an elective office as a result of being elected to it.

“Composite abstract” means a document signed by the members of the State Board showing the total number of votes for each candidate and ballot proposal and the number of votes in each county. A composite abstract does not include precinct returns.

“Protest” means a complaint concerning the conduct of an election which, if supported by sufficient evidence, may require remedy by one or more of the following:

A correction in the returns.

A discretionary recount as provided in

G.S. 163-182.7

.

A new election as provided in

G.S. 163-182.13

.

History.
2001-398, s. 3; 2010-96, ss. 19, 35; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-182.1.
Principles and rules for counting official ballots.

General Principles That Shall Apply. — The following general principles shall apply in the counting of official ballots, whether the initial count or any recount:

Only official ballots shall be counted.

No official ballot shall be rejected because of technical errors in marking it, unless it is impossible to clearly determine the voter’s choice.

If it is impossible to clearly determine a voter’s choice in a ballot item, the official ballot shall not be counted for that ballot item, but shall be counted in all other ballot items in which the voter’s choice can be clearly determined.

If an official ballot is marked in a ballot item with more choices than there are offices to be filled or propositions that may prevail, the official ballot shall not be counted for that ballot item, but shall be counted in all other ballot items in which
there is no overvote and the voter’s choice can be clearly determined.

If an official ballot is rejected by a scanner or other counting machine, but human counters can clearly determine the voter’s choice, the official ballot shall be counted by hand and eye.

Write-in votes shall not be counted in party primaries or in referenda, but shall be counted in general elections if all of the following are true:

The write-in vote is written by the voter or by a person authorized to assist the voter pursuant to

G.S. 163-166.8

.

The write-in vote is not cast for a candidate who has failed to qualify under

G.S. 163-123

as a write-in candidate.

The voter’s choice can be clearly determined.

Procedures and Standards. — The State Board of Elections shall adopt uniform and nondiscriminatory procedures and standards for voting systems. The standards shall define what constitutes a vote and what will be counted as a vote for each category of
voting system used in the State. The State Board shall adopt those procedures and standards at a meeting occurring not earlier than 15 days after the State Board gives notice of the meeting. The procedures and standards adopted
shall apply to all elections occurring in the State and shall be subject to amendment or repeal by the State Board acting at any meeting where notice that the action has been proposed has been given at least 15 days before the
meeting. These procedures and standards shall not be considered to be rules subject to Article 2A of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. However, the State Board shall publish in the North Carolina Register the procedures and
standards and any changes to them after adoption, with that publication noted as information helpful to the public under G.S. 150B-21.17(a)(6). Copies of those procedures and standards shall be made available to the public upon
request or otherwise by the State Board. For optical scan and direct record electronic voting systems, and for any other voting systems in which ballots are counted other than on paper by hand and eye, those procedures and standards
shall do both of the following:

Provide for a sample hand-to-eye count of the paper ballots of a statewide ballot item in every county. The presidential ballot item shall be the subject of the sampling in a presidential election. If there is no statewide ballot item, the State Board
shall provide a process for selecting district or local ballot items to adequately sample the electorate. The State Board shall approve in an open meeting the procedure for randomly selecting the sample precincts for each
election. The random selection of precincts for any county shall be done publicly after the initial count of election returns for that county is publicly released or 24 hours after the polls close on election day, whichever
is earlier. The sample chosen by the State Board shall be of one or more full precincts, full counts of mailed absentee ballots, full counts of one or more one-stop early voting sites, or a combination. The size of the
sample of each category shall be chosen to produce a statistically significant result and shall be chosen after consultation with a statistician. The actual units shall be chosen at random. In the event of a material discrepancy
between the electronic or mechanical count and a hand-to-eye count, the hand-to-eye count shall control, except where paper ballots have been lost or destroyed or where there is another reasonable basis to conclude that
the hand-to-eye count is not the true count. If the discrepancy between the hand-to-eye count and the mechanical or electronic count is significant, a complete hand-to-eye count shall be conducted.

Provide that if the voter selects votes for more than the number of candidates to be elected or proposals to be approved in a ballot item, the voting system shall do all the following:

Notify the voter that the voter has selected more than the correct number of candidates or proposals in the ballot item.

Notify the voter before the vote is accepted and counted of the effect of casting overvotes in the ballot item.

Provide the voter with the opportunity to correct the official ballot before it is accepted and counted.

History.
2001-398, s. 3; 2003-226, s. 13; 2005-323, s. 5(a); 2006-192, s. 7(a); 2006-264, s. 76(b); 2013-381, ss. 30.5, 32.2; 2015-103, s. 6(b); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-13, s. 3.11(b); 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-182.1A.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2018-144, s. 3.1(h), effective December 19, 2018.

History.
2013-381, s. 2.8; 2017-6, s. 3; repealed by 2018-144, s. 3.1(h), effective December 19, 2018.

§ 163-182.1B.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2018-144, s. 3.1(i), effective December 19, 2018.

History.
2015-103, s. 8(e); 2017-6, s. 3; repealed by 2018-144, s. 3.1(i), effective December 19, 2018.

§ 163-182.2.
Initial counting of official ballots.

The initial counting of official ballots shall be conducted according to the following principles:

Vote counting at the precinct shall occur immediately after the polls close and shall be continuous until completed.

Vote counting at the precinct shall be conducted with the participation of precinct officials of all political parties then present. Vote counting at the county board of elections shall be conducted in the presence or under the supervision of board members
of all political parties then present.

Any member of the public wishing to witness the vote count at any level shall be allowed to do so. No witness shall interfere with the orderly counting of the official ballots. Witnesses shall not participate in the official counting of official ballots.

If the county board of elections finds that an individual voting a provisional official ballot (i) was registered in the county as provided in 163-82.1, (ii) voted in the proper precinct under

G.S. 163-55

and

G.S. 163-57

, and (iii) was otherwise eligible to vote, the provisional official ballots shall be counted by the county board of elections before the canvass. Except as provided in

G.S. 163-82.1

5(e), if the county board finds that an individual voting a provisional official ballot (i) did not vote in the proper precinct under

G.S. 163-55

and

G.S. 163-57

, (ii) is not registered in the county as provided in

G.S. 163-82.1

, or (iii) is otherwise not eligible to vote, the ballot shall not be counted. If a voter was properly registered to vote in the election by the county board, no mistake of an election official in giving
the voter a ballot or in failing to comply with

G.S. 163-82.15

or

G.S. 163-166.11

shall serve to prevent the counting of the vote on any ballot item the voter was eligible by registration and qualified by residency to vote.

Precinct officials shall provide a preliminary report of the vote counting on election day to the county board of elections as quickly as possible. The preliminary report shall be unofficial, has no binding effect upon the official county canvass to follow,
and shall include the number of provisional ballots cast in that precinct.

In counties that use any certified mechanical or electronic voting system, subject to the sample counts under

G.S. 163-182.1

and subdivision (2) of subsection (b) of this section, and of a hand-to-eye recount under

G.S. 163-182.7

and

G.S. 163-182.7

A, a board of elections shall rely in its canvass on the mechanical or electronic count of the vote rather than the full hand-to-eye count of the paper ballots or records. In the event of a material discrepancy
between the electronic or mechanical count and a hand-to-eye count or recount, the hand-to-eye count or recount shall control, except where paper ballots or records have been lost or destroyed or where there is another
reasonable basis to conclude that the hand-to-eye count is not the true count.

The State Board of Elections shall promulgate rules for the initial counting of official ballots. All election officials shall be governed by those rules. In promulgating those rules, the State Board shall adhere to the following guidelines:

For each voting system used, the rules shall specify the role of precinct officials and of the county board of elections in the initial counting of official ballots.

For optical scan and direct record electronic voting systems, and for any other voting systems in which ballots are counted other than on paper by hand and eye, those rules shall provide for a sample hand-to-eye count of the paper ballots of a sampling
of a statewide ballot item in every county. The presidential ballot item shall be the subject of the sampling in a presidential election. If there is no statewide ballot item, the State Board shall provide a process for
selecting district or local ballot items to adequately sample the electorate. The State Board shall approve in an open meeting the procedure for randomly selecting the sample precincts for each election. The random selection
of precincts for any county shall be done publicly after the initial count of election returns for that county is publicly released or 24 hours after the polls close on election day, whichever is earlier. The sample chosen
by the State Board shall be of one or more full precincts, full counts of mailed absentee ballots, and full counts of one or more one-stop early voting sites. The size of the sample of each category shall be chosen to produce
a statistically significant result and shall be chosen after consultation with a statistician. The actual units shall be chosen at random. In the event of a material discrepancy between the electronic or mechanical count
and a hand-to-eye count, the hand-to-eye count shall control, except where paper ballots have been lost or destroyed or where there is another reasonable basis to conclude that the hand-to-eye count is not the true count.
If the discrepancy between the hand-to-eye count and the mechanical or electronic count is significant, a complete hand-to-eye count shall be conducted. The sample count need not be done on election night.

The rules shall provide for accurate unofficial reporting of the results from the precinct to the county board of elections with reasonable speed on the night of the election.

The rules shall provide for the prompt and secure transmission of official ballots from the voting place to the county board of elections.

The State Board shall direct the county boards of elections in the application of the principles and rules in individual circumstances.

History.
2001-398, s. 3; 2005-2, s. 5; 2005-323, s. 5(b); 2006-192, s. 7(b); 2006-264, s. 76(c); 2013-381, ss. 30.6, 49.4; 2014-111, s. 12(c); 2015-103, s. 6(b); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-13, s. 3.11(b); 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b); 2020-17,
s. 4.5(a).

Prior Law in Force.

In the case of NAACP v. McCrory, the defendants were enjoined from implementing certain portions of Session Laws 2013-381 and Session Laws 2015-103, relating to photo IDs and changes to early voting, same-day registration, out-of-precinct voting, and
preregistration, and the pertinent statutory provisions in effect prior to those amendments were declared to be in full force (Case 1:13-cv-00658-TDS-JEP Document 455 (M.D.N.C. 2016). In a letter dated October 5, 2017, the Revisor
was informed that as a result, the version of this section that the State Board was actually enforcing is as follows:

§ 163-182.2. Initial counting of official ballots.

The initial counting of official ballots shall be conducted according to the following principles:

Vote counting at the precinct shall occur immediately after the polls close and shall be continuous until completed.

Vote counting at the precinct shall be conducted with the participation of precinct officials of all political parties then present. Vote counting at the county board of elections shall be conducted in the presence or under the supervision of board members
of all political parties then present.

Any member of the public wishing to witness the vote count at any level shall be allowed to do so. No witness shall interfere with the orderly counting of the official ballots. Witnesses shall not participate in the official counting of official ballots.

Provisional official ballots shall be counted by the county board of elections before the canvass. If the county board finds that an individual voting a provisional official ballot is not eligible to vote in one or more ballot items on the official ballot,
the board shall not count the official ballot in those ballot items, but shall count the official ballot in any ballot items for which the individual is eligible to vote. Eligibility shall be determined by whether the voter
is registered in the county as provided in

G.S. 163-82.1

and whether the voter is qualified by residency to vote in the election district as provided in

G.S. 163-55

and

G.S. 163-57

. If a voter was properly registered to vote in the election by the county board, no mistake of an election official in giving the voter a ballot or in failing to comply with

G.S. 163-82.1

5 or

G.S. 163-166.11

shall serve to prevent the counting of the vote on any ballot item the voter was eligible by registration and qualified by residency to vote.

Precinct officials shall provide a preliminary report of the vote counting to the county board of elections as quickly as possible. The preliminary report shall be unofficial and has no binding effect upon the official county canvass to follow.

In counties that use any certified mechanical or electronic voting system, subject to the sample counts under

G.S. 163-182.1

and subdivision (1a) of subsection (b) of this section, and of a hand-to-eye recount under

G.S. 163-182.7

and

G.S. 163-182.7

A, a board of elections shall rely in its canvass on the mechanical or electronic count of the vote rather than the full hand-to-eye count of the paper ballots or records. In the event of a material discrepancy
between the electronic or mechanical count and a hand-to-eye count or recount, the hand-to-eye count or recount shall control, except where paper ballots or records have been lost or destroyed or where there is another
reasonable basis to conclude that the hand-to-eye count is not the true count.

The State Board of Elections shall promulgate rules for the initial counting of official ballots. All election officials shall be governed by those rules. In promulgating those rules, the State Board shall adhere to the following guidelines:

For each voting system used, the rules shall specify the role of precinct officials and of the county board of elections in the initial counting of official ballots.

The rules shall provide for accurate unofficial reporting of the results from the precinct to the county board of elections with reasonable speed on the night of the election.

The rules shall provide for the prompt and secure transmission of official ballots from the voting place to the county board of elections.

(1a) (Effective until January 1, 2018) For optical scan and direct record electronic voting systems, and for any other voting systems in which ballots are counted other than on paper by hand and eye, those rules shall provide for a sample hand-to-eye
count of the paper ballots or paper records of a sampling of a statewide ballot item in every county. The presidential ballot item shall be the subject of the sampling in a presidential election. If there is no statewide ballot item,
the State Board shall provide a process for selecting district or local ballot items to adequately sample the electorate. The State Board shall approve in an open meeting the procedure for randomly selecting the sample precincts for
each election. The random selection of precincts for any county shall be done publicly after the initial count of election returns for that county is publicly released or 24 hours after the polls close on election day, whichever is
earlier. The sample chosen by the State Board shall be of one or more full precincts, full counts of mailed absentee ballots, and full counts of one or more one-stop early voting sites. The size of the sample of each category shall
be chosen to produce a statistically significant result and shall be chosen after consultation with a statistician. The actual units shall be chosen at random. In the event of a material discrepancy between the electronic or mechanical
count and a hand-toeye count, the hand-to-eye count shall control, except where paper ballots or records have been lost or destroyed or where there is another reasonable basis to conclude that the hand-to-eye count is not the true
count. If the discrepancy between the hand-to-eye count and the

(1a) (Effective January 1, 2018) For optical scan and direct record electronic voting systems, and for any other voting systems in which ballots are counted other than on paper by hand and eye, those rules shall provide for a sample hand-to-eye count
of the paper ballots of a sampling of a statewide ballot item in every county. The presidential ballot item shall be the subject of the sampling in a presidential election. If there is no statewide ballot item, the State Board shall
provide a process for selecting district or local ballot items to adequately sample the electorate. The State Board shall approve in an open meeting the procedure for randomly selecting the sample precincts for each election. The random
selection of precincts for any county shall be done publicly after the initial count of election returns for that county is publicly released or 24 hours after the polls close on election day, whichever is earlier. The sample chosen
by the State Board shall be of one or more full precincts, full counts of mailed absentee ballots, and full counts of one or more one-stop early voting sites. The size of the sample of each category shall be chosen to produce a statistically
significant result and shall be chosen after consultation with a statistician. The actual units shall be chosen at random. In the event of a material discrepancy between the electronic or mechanical count and a hand-to-eye count, the
hand-to-eye count shall control, except where paper ballots have been lost or destroyed or where there is another reasonable basis to conclude that the hand-to-eye count is not the true count. If the discrepancy between the hand-to-eye
count and the mechanical or electronic count is significant, a complete hand-to-eye count shall be conducted. The sample count need not be done on election night.

The State Board shall direct the county boards of elections in the application of the principles and rules in individual circumstances.

§ 163-182.3.
Responsibility of chief judge.

The chief judge of each precinct shall be responsible for the adherence of the precinct officials to the State Board rules for counting, reporting, and transmitting official ballots.

History.
2001-398, s. 3; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-182.4.
Jurisdiction for certain ballot items.

Jurisdiction of County Board of Elections. — As used in this Part, the county board of elections shall have jurisdiction over the following:

Offices of that county, including clerk of superior court and register of deeds.

Membership in either house of the General Assembly from a district lying entirely within that county.

Offices of municipalities, unless the municipality has a valid board of election.

Referenda in which only residents of that county are eligible to vote.

Jurisdiction of State Board of Elections. — As used in this Article, the State Board of Elections shall have jurisdiction over the following:

National offices.

State offices.

District offices (including General Assembly seats) in which the district lies in more than one county.

Superior court judge, district court judge, and district attorney, regardless of whether the district lies entirely in one county or in more than one county.

Referenda in which residents of more than one county are eligible to vote.

For the purposes of this Article, having jurisdiction shall mean that the appropriate board shall do all of the following with regard to the ballot item:

Canvass for the entire electorate for the ballot item.

Prepare abstracts or composite abstracts for the entire electorate for the ballot item.

Issue certificates of nomination and election.

History.
2001-398, s. 3; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-182.5.
Canvassing votes.

The Canvass. — As used in this Article, the term “canvass” means the entire process of determining that the votes have been counted and tabulated correctly, culminating in the authentication of the official election results. The board of elections conducting
a canvass has authority to send for papers and persons and to examine them and pass upon the legality of disputed ballots.

Canvassing by County Board of Elections. — The county board of elections shall meet at 11:00 A.M. on the tenth day after every election to complete the canvass of votes cast and to authenticate the count in every ballot item in the county by determining
that the votes have been counted and tabulated correctly. If, despite due diligence by election officials, the initial counting of all the votes has not been completed by that time, the county board may hold the canvass meeting
a reasonable time thereafter. The canvass meeting shall be at the county board of elections office, unless the county board, by unanimous vote of all its members, designates another site within the county. The county board shall
examine the returns from precincts, from absentee official ballots, from the sample hand-to-eye paper ballot counts, and from provisional official ballots and shall conduct the canvass.

Canvassing by State Board of Elections. — After each general election, the State Board of Elections shall meet at 11:00 A.M. on the Tuesday three weeks after election day to complete the canvass of votes cast in all ballot items within the jurisdiction
of the State Board of Elections and to authenticate the count in every ballot item in the county by determining that the votes have been counted and tabulated correctly. After each primary, the State Board shall fix the date of
its canvass meeting. If, by the time of its scheduled canvass meeting, the State Board has not received the county canvasses, the State Board may adjourn for not more than 10 days to secure the missing abstracts. In obtaining them,
the State Board is authorized to secure the originals or copies from the appropriate clerks of superior court or county boards of elections, at the expense of the counties.

History.
2001-398, s. 3; 2003-278, s. 10(a); 2005-323, s. 5(c); 2005-428, s. 11(a); 2016-109, s. 1; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-182.6.
Abstracts.

Abstracts to Be Prepared by County Board of Elections. — As soon as the county canvass has been completed, the county board of elections shall prepare abstracts of all the ballot items in a form prescribed by the State Board of Elections. The county
board shall prepare those abstracts in triplicate originals. The county board shall retain one of the triplicate originals, and shall distribute one each to the clerk of superior court for the county and the State Board of Elections.
The State Highway Patrol may, upon request of the State Board of Elections, be responsible for the delivery of the abstracts from each county to the State Board of Elections. The State Board of Elections shall forward the original
abstract it receives to the Secretary of State.

Composite Abstracts to Be Prepared by the State Board of Elections. — As soon as the State canvass has been completed, the State Board shall prepare composite abstracts of all those ballot items. It shall prepare those composite abstracts in duplicate
originals. It shall retain one of the originals and shall send the other original to the Secretary of State.

Duty of the Secretary of State. — The Secretary of State shall maintain the certified copies of abstracts received from the county and State boards of elections. The Secretary shall keep the abstracts in a form readily accessible and useful to the public.

Forms by State Board of Elections. — The State Board of Elections shall prescribe forms for all abstracts. Those forms shall be uniform and shall, at a minimum, state the name of each candidate and the office sought and each referendum proposal, the
number of votes cast for each candidate and proposal, the candidate or proposal determined to have prevailed, and a statement authenticating the count.

History.
2001-398, s. 3; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-182.7.
Ordering recounts.

Discretionary Recounts. — The county board of elections or the State Board of Elections may order a recount when necessary to complete the canvass in an election. The county board may not order a recount where the State Board of Elections has already
denied a recount to the petitioner.

Mandatory Recounts for Ballot Items Within the Jurisdiction of the County Board of Elections. — In a ballot item within the jurisdiction of the county board of elections, a candidate shall have the right to demand a recount of the votes if the difference
between the votes for that candidate and the votes for a prevailing candidate is not more than one percent (1%) of the total votes cast in the ballot item, or in the case of a multiseat ballot item not more than one percent (1%)
of the votes cast for those two candidates. The demand for a recount must be made in writing and must be received by the county board of elections by 5:00 P.M. on the first business day after the canvass. The recount shall be conducted
under the supervision of the county board of elections.

Mandatory Recounts for Ballot Items Within the Jurisdiction of the State Board of Elections. — In a ballot item within the jurisdiction of the State Board of Elections, a candidate shall have the right to demand a recount of the votes if the difference
between the votes for that candidate and the votes for a prevailing candidate are not more than the following:

For a nonstatewide ballot item, one percent (1%) of the total votes cast in the ballot item, or in the case of a multiseat ballot item, one percent (1%) of the votes cast for those two candidates.

For a statewide ballot item, one-half of one percent (0.5%) of the votes cast in the ballot item, or 10,000 votes, whichever is less.

The demand for a recount must be in writing and must be received by the State Board of Elections by noon on the second business day after the county canvass. If at that time the available returns show a candidate not entitled to a mandatory recount, but
the Executive Director determines subsequently that the margin is within the threshold set out in this subsection, the Executive Director shall notify the eligible candidate immediately and that candidate shall be entitled
to a recount if that candidate so demands within 48 hours of notice. The recount shall be conducted under the supervision of the State Board of Elections.

Rules for Conducting Recounts. — The State Board of Elections shall promulgate rules for conducting recounts. Those rules shall be subject to the following guidelines:

The rules shall specify, with respect to each type of voting system, when and to what extent the recount shall consist of machine recounts and hand-to-eye recounts. Hand-to-eye recounts shall also be ordered as provided by

G.S. 163-182.7

A.

The rules shall provide guidance in interpretation of the voter’s choice.

The rules shall specify how the goals of multipartisan participation, opportunity for public observation, and good order shall be balanced.

History.
2001-398, s. 3; 2003-278, ss. 10(b), 10(c); 2005-323, s. 6(a); 2005-428, s. 11(b); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-182.7A.
Additional provisions for hand-to-eye recounts.

The rules promulgated by the State Board of Elections for recounts shall provide that if the initial recount is not hand-to-eye, and if the recount does not reverse the results, the candidate who had originally been entitled to a recount may, within 24
hours of the completion of the first recount, demand a second recount on a hand-to-eye basis in a sample of precincts. If the initial recount was not hand-to-eye and it reversed the results, the candidate who had initially been
the winner shall have the same right to ask for a hand-to-eye recount in a sample of precincts.That sample shall be all the ballots in three percent (3%) of the precincts casting ballots in each county in the jurisdiction of the
office, rounded up to the next whole number of precincts. For the purpose of that calculation, each one-stop (early) voting site shall be considered to be a precinct. The precincts to be recounted by a hand-to-eye count shall be
chosen at random within each county. If the results of the hand-to-eye recount differ from the previous results within those precincts to the extent that extrapolating the amount of the change to the entire jurisdiction (based
on the proportion of ballots recounted to the total votes cast for that office) would result in the reversing of the results, then the State Board of Elections shall order a hand-to-eye recount of the entire jurisdiction in which
the election is held. There shall be no cost to the candidate for that recount in the entire jurisdiction.

Recounts under this section shall be governed by rules adopted under G.S. 163-182.7(d).

No complete hand-to-eye recount shall be conducted under this section if one has already been done under another provision of law.

History.
2005-323, s. 6(b); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-182.8.
Determining result in case of a tie.

If the count, upon completion of canvass by the proper board of elections, shows a tie vote other than in a primary, the tie shall be resolved as follows:

If more than 5,000 voters cast official ballots in the ballot item, the State Board of Elections shall order a new election in which only the candidates or positions tied will be on the official ballot. The State Board of Elections shall set the schedule
for publication of the notice, preparation of absentee official ballots, and the other actions necessary to conduct the election. Eligibility to vote in the new election shall be determined by the voter’s eligibility at the time
of the new election.

If 5,000 or fewer voters cast official ballots in the ballot item, the board of elections with jurisdiction to certify the election shall break the tie by a method of random selection to be determined by the State Board of Elections.

History.
2001-398, s. 3; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-182.9.
Filing an election protest.

Who May File a Protest With County Board. — A protest concerning the conduct of an election may be filed with the county board of elections by any registered voter who was eligible to vote in the election or by any person who was a candidate for nomination
or election in the election.

How Protest May Be Filed. — The following principles shall apply to the filing of election protests with the county board of elections:

The protest shall be in writing and shall be signed by the protester. It shall include the protester’s name, address, and telephone number and a statement that the person is a registered voter in the jurisdiction or a candidate.

The protest shall state whether the protest concerns the manner in which votes were counted and results tabulated or concerns some other irregularity.

The protest shall state what remedy the protester is seeking.

The timing for filing a protest shall be as follows:

If the protest concerns the manner in which votes were counted or results tabulated, the protest shall be filed before the beginning of the county board of election’s canvass meeting.

If the protest concerns the manner in which votes were counted or results tabulated and the protest states good cause for delay in filing, the protest may be filed until 5:00 P.M. on the second business day after the county board of elections has completed
its canvass and declared the results.

If the protest concerns an irregularity other than vote counting or result tabulation, the protest shall be filed no later than 5:00 P.M. on the second business day after the county board has completed its canvass and declared the results.

If the protest concerns an irregularity on a matter other than vote counting or result tabulation and the protest is filed before election day, the protest proceedings shall be stayed, unless a party defending against the protest moves otherwise, until
after election day if any one of the following conditions exists:

The ballot has been printed.

The voter registration deadline for that election has passed.

Any of the proceedings will occur within 30 days before election day.

State Board to Prescribe Forms. — The State Board of Elections shall prescribe forms for filing protests.

History.
2001-398, s. 3; 2005-428, s. 4; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).